Massachusetts, session 194th, S445.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended in Section 48A in line 1 by inserting
before the word “School”, the following:- “(a)”
Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended in Section 48A by inserting in line 22
after the word “section”, the following:-
(b) Parental Notification of Law Enforcement Action on School Grounds
Section 1. Definitions
For the purpose of this section the following words shall have the following meanings
of 3

"School grounds", the real property comprising an active and operational elementary or
secondary school during the regular hours in which school is in session and when students are
present.
''School resource officer'', a duly sworn municipal police officer with all necessary
training, up-to-date certificates, including special school resource officer certification as required
by subsection (b) of section 3 of chapter 6E or a special officer appointed by the chief of police
charged with: (i) providing law enforcement; (ii) promoting school safety and security services
to elementary and secondary public schools; and (iii) maintaining a positive school climate for
all students, families and staff.
Section 2.
If local or state law enforcement is called to school grounds to make arrests or engage in
activity to ensure the safety of students or faculty beyond the regular duties undertaken by that
school’s school resource officer, the principal of that school or superintendent of that school
district or a designee of said principal or superintendent shall make a report by mail, electronic
mail, or phone call of the incident to the parents or guardians of students who attend the school
within twenty-four hours of the initial call to law enforcement. This report shall include the
following information:
i.) The time at which law enforcement was called to the school.
ii.) The reason for which law enforcement was called, omitting any information which
could be used to identify specific students or faculty.
iii.) The time at which law enforcement officers left school grounds.
of 3

The report shall not include any information which could be used to identify any specific
student or faculty member of the school.
Section 3.
This Section shall not limit the authority of a law enforcement officer to make an arrest
on school grounds. This Section shall not delay action by law enforcement officers in
circumstances that would cause a reasonable person to believe that urgent and immediate action
is necessary to do any of the following:
i.) Prevent bodily harm or injury to the student or any other person
ii.) Apprehend an armed or fleeing suspect
iii.) Prevent the destruction of evidence
iv.) Address an emergency or other dangerous situation
(c.) This Act shall take effect upon passage.
of 3